Maryland, session 2025, HB1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–501.
(a) A cannabis agent must be registered with the Administration before the agent
may volunteer or work for a cannabis licensee or cannabis registrant.
(b) A cannabis agent registration is valid for 2 years.
(c) (1) [To] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO register as a cannabis agent with the Administration, an individual
must:
[(1)] (I) be at least 21 years old; and
[(2)] (II) if the records are legally accessible, obtain a State and national
criminal history records check in accordance with § 36–505 of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1347 3
(2) A CANNABIS AGENT WHO IS EMPLOYED TO PROVIDE SECURITY
SERVICES FOR A CANNABIS LICENSEE OR CANNABIS REGISTRANT AS A SECURITY
GUARD OR BY A SECURITY GUARD AGENCY, AS DEFINED IN § 19–101 OF THE
BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE, IS NOT REQUIRED TO
OBTAIN A STATE OR NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 36–505 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE CANNABIS AGENT IS
AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE SECURITY GUARD SERVICES UNDER TITLE 19, SUBTITLE
4 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
(d) (1) The Administration may not register as a cannabis agent an individual
who does not meet the criteria established under subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The Administration may disqualify an individual from registering as a
cannabis agent if the individual has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime
involving moral turpitude, whether or not any appeal or other proceeding is pending to
have the conviction or plea set aside.
(e) The Administration may not deny a cannabis agent registration based on any
cannabis–related offenses occurring before July 1, 2023.
(f) A cannabis licensee shall require each registered cannabis agent to complete
an annual responsible vendor training program authorized under this title.
(g) A registration of a cannabis agent issued by the Natalie M. LaPrade Medical
Cannabis Commission on or before July 1, 2023, shall:
(1) be valid under this title; and
(2) authorize the cannabis agent to be employed by or volunteer with a
licensed cannabis business.
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Security guard” means an individual who, regardless of whether the
individual is described as a security guard, watchman, or private patrolman or by other
title:
(1) (i) is an employee of a security guard agency; and
(ii) provides security guard services to another person on behalf of
the security guard agency; or

HOUSE BILL 1347
(2) (i) is an employee of a security guard employer; and
(ii) provides security guard services to the security guard employer.
(l) (1) “Security guard agency” means a person who conducts a business that
provides security guard services.
(2) “Security guard agency” does not include:
(i) a person that is primarily engaged in the business of owning,
maintaining, or otherwise managing property; or
(ii) a security guard employer.
(m) (1) “Security guard employer” means a person who employs security guards
only to provide security guard services to the person.
(2) “Security guard employer” does not include:
(I) a security guard agency;
(II) A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR, AS DEFINED UNDER §
9–1A–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(III) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE, AS DEFINED
UNDER § 9–1E–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(IV) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY, AS DEFINED UNDER § 19–114 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
19–201.
Subject to the provisions of this title, the Secretary is responsible for the licensing of
security guard agencies and the regulation of those persons who provide security guard
services in the State.
19–401.
(c) Except as provided under subsection (d) of this section, a security guard
employer may employ a security guard to provide security guard services only if the
individual is certified by the Secretary as a security guard.
Article – State Government
9–1A–14.

HOUSE BILL 1347 5
(a) Unless an individual holds a valid video lottery employee license or temporary
video lottery employee license issued by the Commission, the individual may not be employed
by a video lottery operation licensee as a video lottery employee.
(b) Before issuance of a video lottery employee license, an applicant shall provide
sufficient information, documentation, and assurances that the Commission may require.
9–1E–03.
(a) (1) Unless the context requires otherwise, the requirements under §§
9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18, 9–1A–19, 9–1A–20, and
9–1A–25 of this title apply to the authority, duties, and responsibilities of the Commission,
a sports wagering licensee, and an employee or a contractor of a sports wagering licensee
under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.